Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
PART 1 General Provisions

Cross references.

Instruction of poll officers in use of voting machines and vote recorders, §

21-2-99

.

Penalties for offenses relating to ballots and ballot cards, §§

21-2-566

and

21-2-574

et seq.

21-2-310.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Candidate counters” or “question counters” means the counters which numerically register the votes cast for candidates and on questions, respectively.

“Diagram” means an illustration of the official ballot showing the names of the parties, bodies, offices, and candidates and statements of the questions, in their proper places, together with the voting devices therefor.

“Protective counter” means a counter or protective device or devices that will register each time the machine is operated and shall be constructed and so connected that it cannot be reset, altered, or operated except by operating the machine.

“Public counter” means a counter or other device which shall, at all times, publicly indicate how many times the machine has been voted on during an election.

“Registering counter” shall not include a protective counter.

“Vote indicator” means those devices with which votes are indicated for candidates or for or against questions.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1201, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1087, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 243, § 7; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.